backend/sq_AL_cleaned.aff
SFX G1 Y 102
SFX G1 a ëngsha ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 a ëngsh ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 a ëngërt ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 a ëngshim ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 a ëngshi ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 a ëngshin ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 bie prufsha bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 bie prufsh bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 bie pruftë bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 bie prufshim bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 bie prufshi bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 bie prufshin bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 bie rafsha bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 bie rafsh bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 bie raftë bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 bie rafshim bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 bie rafshi bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 bie rafshin bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 e fsh tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 e fsha tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 e fshi tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 e fshim tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 e fshin tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 e ftë tie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 e itsha re po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 e itsh re po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 e ittë re po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 e itshim re po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 e itshi re po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 e itshin re po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 ha ngrënça ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 ha ngrënç ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 ha ngrëntë ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 ha ngrënçim ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 ha ngrënçi ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 ha ngrënçin ha po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 jam qofsha jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 jam qofsh jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 jam qoftë jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 jam qofshim jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 jam qofshi jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 jam qofshin jam po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 ete afsh ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 ete afsha ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 ete afshi ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 ete afshim ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 ete afshin ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 ete aftë ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 i sha [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 i sh [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 i të [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 i shim [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 i shi [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 i shin [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 iej jefsha [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 iej jefsh [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 iej jeftë [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 iej jefshim [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 iej jefshi [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 iej jefshin [dz]iej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 j tsha [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 j tsh [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 j ttë [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 j tshim [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 j tshi [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 j tshin [^iy][ie]j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 le jetsha le po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 le jetsh le po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 le jettë le po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 le jetshim le po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 le jetshi le po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 le jetshin le po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 shoh pafsha shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 shoh pafsh shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 shoh paftë shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 shoh pafshim shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 shoh pafshi shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 shoh pafshin shoh po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 ua aça ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 ua aç ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 ua ashtë ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 ua açim ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 ua açi ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 ua açin ua po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 uaj ofsha uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 uaj ofsh uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 uaj oftë uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 uaj ofshim uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 uaj ofshi uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 uaj ofshin uaj po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 yej efsha yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 yej efsh yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 yej eftë yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 yej efshim yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 yej efshi yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 yej efshin yej po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G1 errem arrsha rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G1 errem arrsh rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G1 errem arrtë rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G1 errem arrshim rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G1 errem arrshi rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G1 errem arrshin rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3

SFX G2 Y 102
SFX G2 bie rënça bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 bie rënç bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 bie rëntë bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 bie rënçim bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 bie rënçi bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 bie rënçin bie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 ete ajç ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 ete ajça ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 ete ajçi ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 ete ajçim ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 ete ajçin ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 ete ajttë ete po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 ie ufsha pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 ie ufsh pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 ie uftë pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 ie ufshim pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 ie ufshi pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 ie ufshin pie po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 j fsha j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 j fsh j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 j ftë j po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 j fshim j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 j fshi j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 j fshin j po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 rri ndenjça rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 rri ndenjç rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 rri ndenjtë rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 rri ndenjçim rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 rri ndenjçi rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 rri ndenjçin rri po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 idhem jedhsha idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 idhem jedhsh idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 idhem jedhtë idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 idhem jedhshim idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 idhem jedhshi idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 idhem jedhshin idhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 hem jtsha [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 hem jtsh [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 hem jttë [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 hem jtshim [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 hem jtshi [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 hem jtshin [ao]hem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 ilem jelsha ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 ilem jelsh ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 ilem jeltë ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 ilem jelshim ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 ilem jelshi ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 ilem jelshin ilem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 in ofshin rrin po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 in oftë rrin po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 iqem eqsha iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 iqem eqsh iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 iqem eqtë iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 iqem eqshim iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 iqem eqshi iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 iqem eqshin iqem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 irgjem jergsha irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 irgjem jergsh irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 irgjem jergtë irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 irgjem jergshim irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 irgjem jergshi irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 irgjem jergshin irgjem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 irrem jerrsha rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 irrem jerrsh rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 irrem jerrtë rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 irrem jerrshim rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 irrem jerrshi rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 irrem jerrshin rrem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 item afsha item po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 item afsh item po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 item aftë item po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 item afshim item po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 item afshi item po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 item afshin item po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 jap dhënça jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 jap dhënç jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 jap dhëntë jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 jap dhënçim jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 jap dhënçi jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 jap dhënçin jap po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 n jtshin ven po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 n jttë ven po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 uhem ofsha uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 uhem ofsh uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 uhem oftë uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 uhem ofshim uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 uhem ofshi uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 uhem ofshin uhem po:verb is:j_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 s fsha [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 s fsh [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 s ftë [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 s fshim [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 s fshi [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 s fshin [^d][ae]s po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 s ksha des po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg1
SFX G2 s ksh des po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg2
SFX G2 s ktë des po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX G2 s kshim des po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl1
SFX G2 s kshi des po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl2
SFX G2 s kshin des po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 et shin et po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX G2 et të et po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
